test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AAW_gt-norm.yaml
     sánaaw+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sánaaw
     sánaaw+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sánaawga
     sánaaw+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw
     sánaaw+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaawgang
     sánaaw+V+DIRECT+PAST: sánaawgan
     sánaaw+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sánaawgaa
     sánaaw+V+INDIRECT+PAST: sánaawaan
     sánaaw+V+RELATIVE: sánaaws
     sánaaw+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sánaawaas
     sánaaw+V+NON_FACTIVE: sánaaw.ang
     sánaaw+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sánaawaa.ang
     sánaaw+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sánaawgang
     sánaaw+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sánaawganggang
     sánaaw+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sánaawgangang
     sánaaw+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaawgiinii
     sánaaw+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaawgaangaa
     sánaaw+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaawgaangaan
     sánaaw+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sánaawäsaa
     sánaaw+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sánaawäs
     sánaaw+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sánaawäsaang
     sánaaw+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sánaawäsga
     sánaaw+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sánaawäsaas
     sánaaw+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sánaawäsaa.ang
     sánaaw+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sánaawang k̲asa'áa
     sánaaw+V+NEAR+FUTURE: sánaawang k̲asa'áang
     sánaaw+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sánaawang k̲asaasdláa
     sánaaw+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sánaawang k̲asaasdláang
     sánaaw+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sánaaw'uuj
     sánaaw+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw'uujang
     sánaaw+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sánaawäsaa'uujang
     sánaaw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sánaaw'us
     sánaaw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sánaaw'ujaa
     sánaaw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'uujaangaa
     sánaaw+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sánaawäsaa'us
     sánaaw+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sánaaw'ahlanggang
     sánaaw+V+CERTAIN+PAST: sánaaw'ahlanggan
     sánaaw+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'ahlanggiinii
     sánaaw+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sánaawäsaa'ahlans
     sánaaw+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sánaaw'ahlans
     sánaaw+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: sánaawaa'ahlang
     sánaaw+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sánaawaa'ahlanggaa
     sánaaw+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sánaawaa'ahlanggang
     sánaaw+V+REFLEXIVE: sánaaw'ahl
     sánaaw+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sánaawäseehl
     sánaaw+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sánaaw'uu
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sánaaw'waa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw'waa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw'waang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sánaaw'wägan
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sánaaw'aawaa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sánaaw'aawaan
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sánaaw'waas
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sánaaw'aawaas
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sánaaw'waa.ang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sánaaw'aawaa.ang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sánaawgang'waa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sánaawgang'waang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sánaawgang'waa.ang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'wägiinii
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'wägaangaa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'wägaangaan
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sánaaw'waaäsaa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sánaaw'waaäs
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sánaaw'waaäsaang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sánaaw'waaäsga
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sánaaw'waaäsaas
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sánaaw'waaäsaa.ang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sánaaw'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sánaaw'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sánaaw'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sánaaw'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sánaaw'waa'uuj
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw'waa'uujang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sánaaw'waaäsaa'uujang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sánaaw'waa'us
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sánaaw'waa'ujaa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'waa'uujaangaa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sánaaw'waaäsaa'us
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sánaaw'waa'ahlanggang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sánaaw'waa'ahlanggan
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sánaaw'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sánaaw'waa'ahlans
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sánaaw'aawaa'ahlang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sánaaw'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sánaaw'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sánaaw'waa'ahl
     sánaaw+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sánaaw'waaäseehl
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: sánaaw'ang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sánaaw'angga
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw'anggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: sánaaw'anggan
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sánaaw'aangaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: sánaaw'aangaan
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: sánaaw'ans
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sánaaw'aangaas
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: sánaaw'angang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sánaaw'aangaa.ang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sánaaw'anggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sánaawgang'anggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sánaawgang'angang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'anggiinii
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'anggaangaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'anggaangaan
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sánaaw'angäsaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sánaaw'angäs
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sánaaw'angäsaang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sánaaw'angäsga
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sánaaw'angäsaas
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sánaaw'angäsaa.ang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sánaawang k̲asaa'áng
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sánaawang k̲asaa'ánggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sánaawang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sánaawang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'uuj
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'uujang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sánaaw'angäsaa'uujang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'us
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sánaaw'ang'ujaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'ang'uujaangaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sánaaw'angäsaa'us
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sánaaw'aang'ahlanggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: sánaaw'aang'ahlanggan
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'aang'ahlanggiinii
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sánaaw'angäsaa'ahlans
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sánaaw'aang'ahlans
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: sánaaw'aangaa'ahlang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sánaaw'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sánaaw'aangaa'ahlanggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: sánaaw'aang'ahl
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sánaaw'angäseehl
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: sánaaw'ang'uu
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'waa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'waa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'waang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: sánaaw'ang'wägan
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sánaaw'ang'aawaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: sánaaw'ang'aawaan
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: sánaaw'ang'waas
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: sánaaw'ang'aawaas
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: sánaaw'ang'waa.ang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: sánaaw'ang'aawaa.ang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sánaawgang'ang'waa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: sánaawgang'ang'waang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: sánaawgang'ang'waa.ang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'ang'wägiinii
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'ang'wägaangaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'ang'wägaangaan
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: sánaaw'ang'waaäsaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: sánaaw'ang'waaäs
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: sánaaw'ang'waaäsaang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: sánaaw'ang'waaäsga
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: sánaaw'ang'waaäsaas
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: sánaaw'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: sánaaw'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: sánaaw'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sánaaw'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: sánaaw'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'waa'uuj
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'waa'uujang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: sánaaw'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'waa'us
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: sánaaw'ang'waa'ujaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: sánaaw'ang'waaäsaa'us
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: sánaaw'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: sánaaw'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: sánaaw'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: sánaaw'ang'waa'ahlans
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: sánaaw'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: sánaaw'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: sánaaw'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: sánaaw'ang'waa'ahl
     sánaaw+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: sánaaw'ang'waaäseehl
